Louisiana, session 2026, HB1147.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Civil Procedure Article 4911(D) is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
Art. 4911. Jurisdiction in justice of the peace courts; concurrent with district court;
amount in dispute
* * *
D. The civil jurisdiction of a justice of the peace court, in a parish having a
population of twenty-six thousand or less, is concurrent with the district court in
cases where the amount in dispute does not exceed eight thousand dollars. This
Subsection does not apply in a parish that has a municipal, city, or parish court.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1464 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1147